Hawaii statutes.
[§11-405] Preliminary determination
regarding probable cause. (a) Upon hearing the response, if the
respondent explains or otherwise responds to the complaint, and upon completion
of any investigation, the commission may make a prompt preliminary determination
as to whether probable cause exists that a violation of this part has been
committed. The preliminary determination with findings of fact and conclusions
of law shall be served upon the respondent by certified mail.

(b) The respondent shall be afforded an
opportunity to contest the commission's preliminary determination of probable
cause by making a request for a contested case hearing under chapter 91 within
twenty days of receipt of the preliminary determination. Failure to request a
contested case hearing shall render the commission's preliminary determination final.
[L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next